Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Carcinogen. new text end new text begin "Carcinogen" means an agent that is: (1) classified by the International Agency for Research on Cancer under Group 1 or Group 2A; and (2) reasonably linked to an exposure-related cancer. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Exposure-related cancer. new text end new text begin "Exposure-related cancer" means only the following: new text end new text begin (1) bladder cancer; new text end new text begin (2) brain cancer; new text end new text begin (3) breast cancer; new text end new text begin (4) cervical cancer; new text end new text begin (5) colon cancer; new text end new text begin (6) colorectal cancer; new text end new text begin (7) esophageal cancer; new text end new text begin (8) kidney cancer; new text end new text begin (9) leukemia; new text end new text begin (10) lung cancer; new text end new text begin (11) malignant melanoma; new text end new text begin (12) mesothelioma; new text end new text begin (13) multiple myeloma; new text end new text begin (14) non-Hodgkin lymphoma; new text end new text begin (15) ovarian cancer; new text end new text begin (16) prostate cancer; new text end new text begin (17) skin cancer; new text end new text begin (18) stomach cancer; new text end new text begin (19) testicular cancer; and new text end new text begin (20) thyroid cancer. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Killed in the line of duty. (a) "Killed in the line of duty" does not include deaths from natural causes, except as new text begin expressly new text end provided in this subdivision. In the case of a public safety officer, killed in the line of duty includes the death of a public safety officer caused by accidental means while the public safety officer is acting in the course and scope of duties as a public safety officer. Killed in the line of duty also means if a public safety officer dies as the direct and proximate result of a heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture, that officer shall be presumed to have died as the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained in the line of duty if: (1) that officer, while on duty: (i) engaged in a situation, and that engagement involved nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical new text begin activity in new text end law enforcement, fire suppression, rescue, hazardous material response, emergency medical services, prison security, disaster relief, or other emergency response activity; or (ii) participated in a training exercise, and that participation involved nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity; (2) that officer died as a result of a heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture suffered: (i) while engaging or participating under clause (1); (ii) while still on duty after engaging or participating under clause (1); or (iii) not later than 24 hours after engaging or participating under clause (1); and (3) the presumption is not overcome by competent medical evidence to the contrary. (b) deleted text begin "deleted text end Killed in the line of dutydeleted text begin "deleted text end also deleted text begin means that the officerdeleted text end new text begin includes a public safety officer who new text end died due to suicide: (1) secondary to a diagnosis of posttraumatic stress disorder as described in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association; or (2) within 45 days of the end of exposure, while on duty, to a traumatic event. new text begin (c) Killed in the line of duty also includes the death of a public safety officer as a result of complications caused by exposure sustained in the line of duty to any of the following infectious diseases, viruses, or bacteria, if medical records identify the disease, virus, or bacteria as a cause of or contributing factor to the death: COVID-19, influenza, hepatitis B, hepatitis C, tuberculosis, HIV/AIDS, meningitis, MRSA, whooping cough, or streptococcus pneumoniae. new text end new text begin (d) Killed in the line of duty also means a public safety officer shall be presumed to have been killed in the line of duty if the officer died from an exposure-related cancer that was a result of exposure to a carcinogen when: new text end new text begin (1) the exposure occurred while the public safety officer was acting in the course and scope of duties as a public safety officer; new text end new text begin (2) the public safety officer began serving as a public safety officer not less than five years before the date of the public safety officer's diagnosis of exposure-related cancer; new text end new text begin (3) the public safety officer was diagnosed with exposure-related cancer not more than 15 years after the public safety officer's last date of active service as a public safety officer; and new text end new text begin (4) the exposure-related cancer directly and proximately results in the death of the public safety officer. new text end new text begin (e) The presumption under paragraph (d) does not apply if competent medical evidence establishes that the exposure of the public safety officer to the carcinogen was not a substantial contributing factor in the death of the public safety officer. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Nonroutine strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine strenuous physical activity" means line of duty activity that: new text end new text begin (1) is not an action of a clerical, administrative, or nonmanual nature; new text end new text begin (2) is not performed as a matter of routine; and new text end new text begin (3) entails an unusually high level of physical exertion. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity" means nonroutine stressful physical activity or nonroutine strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3c. new text end new text begin Nonroutine stressful physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine stressful physical activity" means line of duty activity that: new text end new text begin (1) is not an action of a clerical, administrative, or nonmanual nature; new text end new text begin (2) is not performed as a matter of routine; new text end new text begin (3) entails nonnegligible physical exertion; and new text end new text begin (4) occurs: new text end new text begin (i) with respect to a situation in which a public safety officer is engaged under circumstances that objectively and reasonably: new text end new text begin (A) pose or appear to pose significant dangers, threats, or hazards, or reasonably foreseeable risks thereof, not faced by similarly situated members of the public in the ordinary course; and new text end new text begin (B) provoke, cause, or occasion an unusually high level of alarm, fear, or anxiety; or new text end new text begin (ii) with respect to a training exercise in which a public safety officer participates under circumstances that objectively and reasonably: new text end new text begin (A) simulate in realistic fashion situations that pose significant dangers, threats, or hazards; and new text end new text begin (B) provoke, cause, or occasion an unusually high level of alarm, fear, or anxiety. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Public safety officer. "Public safety officer" includes: (1) a peace officer defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c) or (d); (2) a correction officer employed at a correctional facility and charged with maintaining the safety, security, discipline, and custody of inmates at the facility; (3) a corrections staff person working in a public agency and supervising offenders in the community as defined in sections 243.05, subdivision 6; 244.19, subdivision 1; and 401.01, subdivision 2; (4) an individual employed on a full-timenew text begin or part-timenew text end basis by the state or by a fire department of a governmental subdivision of the state, who is engaged in any of the following duties: (i) firefighting; (ii) emergency motor vehicle operation; (iii) investigation into the cause and origin of fires; (iv) the provision of emergency medical services; or (v) hazardous material responder; (5) a legally enrolled member of a volunteernew text begin or paid on-callnew text end fire department or member of an independent nonprofit firefighting corporation who is engaged in the hazards of firefighting; (6) a good samaritan while complying with the request or direction of a public safety officer to assist the officer; (7) a reserve police officer or a reserve deputy sheriff while acting under the supervision and authority of a political subdivision; (8) a driver or attendant with a licensed basic or advanced life-support transportation service who is engaged in providing emergency care; (9) a first responder who is certified by the director of the Office of Emergency Medical Services to perform basic emergency skills before the arrival of a licensed ambulance service and who is a member of an organized service recognized by a local political subdivision to respond to medical emergencies to provide initial medical care before the arrival of an ambulance; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (10) a person, other than a state trooper, employed by the commissioner of public safety and assigned to the State Patrol, whose primary employment duty is either Capitol security or the enforcement of commercial motor vehicle laws and regulationsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (11) a person formerly employed as a public safety officer under clauses (1) to (5) or (7) to (10) if the person separated from service due to a duty disability, as defined in section 353.01, subdivision 41. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [299A.412] DETERMINING WHAT IS ROUTINE. new text end new text begin Neither of the following is dispositive in determining whether an activity or action is understood to have been performed as a matter of routine under section 299A.41: new text end new text begin (1) being generally described by the public safety agency as routine or ordinary; or new text end new text begin (2) the frequency with which the activity or action may be performed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [299A.413] EXPOSURE-RELATED CANCER CLAIMS. new text end new text begin (a) An individual may file a claim that is predicated upon a public safety officer's line of duty death that is the direct and proximate result of an exposure-related cancer if the death occurred on or after January 1, 2020. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person eligible to file a claim for an exposure-related cancer line of duty death of a public safety officer that occurred after January 1, 2020, but before final enactment of this act, has three years from the date of final enactment of this act to file the claim. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.45, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Award amount. (a) The amount of the award is the lesser of: (1) the average tuition and fees charged by the institution; or (2) the tuition maximums established by law for the state grant program under section 136A.121. The tuition maximum for graduate study is the maximum established by law for the state grant program for four-year programs. (b) An award under this subdivision must not affect a recipient's eligibility for a state grant under section 136A.121. (c) For the purposes of this subdivision, "fees" include only those fees that are mandatory and charged to all students attending the institution. (d) For the purpose of benefits awarded under this section, "full time" for a graduate program is eight or more credits per term or the equivalent. new text begin (e) If there are insufficient funds appropriated for this purpose, the commissioner shall determine the award amounts for each eligible applicant from available resources. new text end